Utah statutes.
59-14-503.   Authority of commission.

The commission may adopt rules which permit smokeless tobacco products without affixed warning labels to remain in the hands of a wholesaler or distributor until the original case or crate is broken, unpacked, or sold.  The commission may permit a manufacturer, wholesaler, or distributor to sell and export smokeless tobacco products to a regular dealer in smokeless tobacco products outside the state, without affixing the warning labels required by Section 59-14-501.

